src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 740
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 741
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>een # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 743
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 746
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>us # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>usen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 747
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>eren # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 749
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>a # ;

LEXICON 750
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>o # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>oen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>iane # ;

LEXICON 754
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>r # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>rne # ;

LEXICON 756
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>us # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>usen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>iane # ;

LEXICON 757
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>mum # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>mumen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>mar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>mane # ;

LEXICON 758
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>is # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 759
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>ks # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>ksen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>gar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>gane # ;

LEXICON 760
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>bonde # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>bonden # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>bønder # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>bøndene # ;

LEXICON 762
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>far # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>faren # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>fedrar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>fedrane # ;

LEXICON 763T
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>ó # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>óen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>øer # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>øene # ;

LEXICON 765
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>mann # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>mannen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>menner # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>mennene # ;

LEXICON 766
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>aen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>eer # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>eene # ;

LEXICON 767
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>ås # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>åsen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>æser # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>æsene # ;

LEXICON 768
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>fader # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>faderen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>fedrar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>fedrane # ;

LEXICON 772
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>is # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>isen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>idar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>idane # ;

LEXICON 773
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>is # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>isen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>iar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>iane # ;

LEXICON 776
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>å # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>åen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>æer # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>æene # ;

LEXICON 779
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>monsieur # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>monsieuren # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>messieurs # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>messieurs # ;

LEXICON 780
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 781
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 782
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>broder # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>broderen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>brødrar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>brødrane # ;

LEXICON 783
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 784
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>es # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 785
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>s # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 785A
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>s # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 786
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>es # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>es # ;

LEXICON 787
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>royalty # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>royaltyen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>royalties # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>royaltyane # ;

LEXICON 788
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>gentleman # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>gentlemen # ;

LEXICON 789
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>um # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>umen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>a # ;

LEXICON 791
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>ter # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>teren # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>tres # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>terane # ;

LEXICON 792
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>y # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 794
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>penny # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>pennyen # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>pence # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>pencane # ;

LEXICON 795
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 797
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%> # ;

LEXICON 798
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%> # ;

LEXICON 799
 +Msc+Sg+Indef:%>us # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Def:%>en # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 79A
 +Msc:%> # ;

LEXICON 801
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>é # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>eet # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%>é # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>ea # ;

LEXICON 805
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>-et # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>-a # ;

LEXICON 809
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>et # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 810
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>et # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>i # ;

LEXICON 814
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>eet # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>a # ;

LEXICON 815
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>et # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>a # ;

LEXICON 816
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>eet # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 822
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>et # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>a # ;

LEXICON 841
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>et # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%> # ;

LEXICON 843
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>um # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>umet # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>a # ;

LEXICON 844
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%>um # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>umet # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>aa # ;

LEXICON 857
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>aa # ;

LEXICON 880
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>a # ;

LEXICON 898
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%> # ;

LEXICON 899
 +Neu+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Def:%>et # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Indef:%>s # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Def:%>sa # ;

LEXICON 89A
 +Neu:%> # ;

LEXICON 902
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 903
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>a # ;

LEXICON 904
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>-a # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>-er # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>-ene # ;

LEXICON 909
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%> # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 911
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>i # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 919
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>erter # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>ertra # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>erter # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ertene # ;

LEXICON 920
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 922
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 924
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 926
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>e # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>ar # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ane # ;

LEXICON 930
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 940
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%> # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 953
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>mor # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>mori # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>mødrer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>mødrene # ;

LEXICON 959
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>ò # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>òa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>aer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>aene # ;

LEXICON 960
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>o # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>oa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>aer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>aene # ;

LEXICON 961
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>o # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>oa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>ør # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ørne # ;

LEXICON 962
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>aa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>eer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>eene # ;

LEXICON 963
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>us # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>usa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>yser # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ysene # ;

LEXICON 964
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>dotter # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>dottera # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>døtrer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>døtrene # ;

LEXICON 966
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>moder # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>modera # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>mødrer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>mødrene # ;

LEXICON 967
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>aa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>eer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>eene # ;

LEXICON 969
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>ó # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>óa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>øer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>øene # ;
