src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot
abc+N:abc 904 ; ! LEMMA_ID=25
alumnus+N:alumn 799 ; ! LEMMA_ID=127292
attføringspengar+N:attføringspenga 780 ; ! LEMMA_ID=127462
avskrivingskonto+N:avskrivingskont 750 ; ! LEMMA_ID=117318
basketballsko+N:basketballsko 754 ; ! LEMMA_ID=125784
blodfan+N:blodfan 785 ; ! LEMMA_ID=133302
bondemøbel+N:bondemøb 816 ; ! LEMMA_ID=133524
bonusdotter+N:bonusd 964 ; ! LEMMA_ID=128201
bonusfar+N:bonusf 762 ; ! LEMMA_ID=128203
bordellmamma+N:bordellmamma 909 ; ! LEMMA_ID=133611
botnhóv+N:botnh 763T ; ! LEMMA_ID=128080
brontosaurus+N:brontosaur 746 ; ! LEMMA_ID=123913
burhøns+N:burhøns 880 ; ! LEMMA_ID=134000
cruiservekt+N:cruiservekt 911 ; ! LEMMA_ID=131770
debattforum+N:debattfor 843 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135515
debatttema+N:debatttema 841 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135522
dime+N:dim 784 ; ! LEMMA_ID=134346
ditt+N:ditt 79A ; ! LEMMA_ID=115832
djevelen+N:djevelen 797 ; ! LEMMA_ID=123522
eldstedotter+N:eldsted 964 ; ! LEMMA_ID=134977
fingernagl+N:fingern 766 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135257
fiskelever+N:fiskelev 922 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135464
fiskelus+N:fiskel 940 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135537
flaps+N:flaps 783 ; ! LEMMA_ID=134392
folkemylder+N:folkemyld 815 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135690
forerter+N:forert 919 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135386
fotformsko+N:fotformsko 754 ; ! LEMMA_ID=137172
galisisk+N:galisisk 89A ; ! LEMMA_ID=138904
gateopptøyar+N:gateopptøya 780 ; ! LEMMA_ID=136441
genfeil+N:genfeil 749 ; ! LEMMA_ID=138312
gigabyte+N:gigabyt 743 ; ! LEMMA_ID=136520
gjennombrottskraft+N:gjennombrottskr 962 ; ! LEMMA_ID=137487
godversnatt+N:godversn 967 ; ! LEMMA_ID=133940
gróv+N:gr 969 ; ! LEMMA_ID=32727
halvesel+N:halves 814 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135039
hartkorn+N:hartkorn 79A ; ! LEMMA_ID=130469
haugbonde+N:haugb 760 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139373
helgefar+N:helgef 762 ; ! LEMMA_ID=137392
helgemamma+N:helgemamma 909 ; ! LEMMA_ID=137394
hestehóv+N:hesteh 763T ; ! LEMMA_ID=128081
hospitalsbroder+N:hospitalsbr 782 ; ! LEMMA_ID=123575
hundreogfemtiårsjubilé+N:hundreogfemtiårsjubil 801 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135911
hurten+N:hurten 797 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139835
hóv+N:h 763T ; ! LEMMA_ID=38112
innesko+N:innesko 754 ; ! LEMMA_ID=130327
innsvingski+N:innsvingski 903 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124811
ishockey-VM+N:ishockey-VM 805 ; ! LEMMA_ID=138468
jordbærbonde+N:jordbærb 760 ; ! LEMMA_ID=138607
kikerter+N:kikert 919 ; ! LEMMA_ID=126403
klosterselle+N:klostersell 902 ; ! LEMMA_ID=131648
kromosomfeil+N:kromosomfeil 749 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139568
kulturmidlar+N:kulturmidla 780 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139804
kvaltann+N:kvalt 967 ; ! LEMMA_ID=129675
kvilemodus+N:kvilemod 756 ; ! LEMMA_ID=137742
lakselus+N:laksel 963 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124812
landnót+N:landn 969 ; ! LEMMA_ID=130125
landsfar+N:landsf 762 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139884
landsmoder+N:landsm 966 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139885
legemiddel+N:legemid 822 ; ! LEMMA_ID=123622
lev+N:lev 740 ; ! LEMMA_ID=125355
limba+N:limba 89A ; ! LEMMA_ID=138042
lottmann+N:lottm 765 ; ! LEMMA_ID=140267
lågpunkt+N:lågpunkt 810 ; ! LEMMA_ID=131855
marihand+N:marih 962 ; ! LEMMA_ID=126289
medmor+N:medm 953 ; ! LEMMA_ID=131038
mineralgjødsel+N:mineralgjøds 920 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135959
museskulder+N:museskuld 920 ; ! LEMMA_ID=128908
nittiårsjubilé+N:nittiårsjubil 801 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135907
passiva+N:passiva 880 ; ! LEMMA_ID=115200
pelemente+N:pelement 902 ; ! LEMMA_ID=131406
pm+N:pm 805 ; ! LEMMA_ID=115209
pumpeorgel+N:pumpeorg 814 ; ! LEMMA_ID=137224
scrapbook+N:scrapbook 785A ; ! LEMMA_ID=124140
shekel+N:shek 741 ; ! LEMMA_ID=125358
skimmelflaggermus+N:skimmelflaggerm 963 ; ! LEMMA_ID=130364
småkårsmann+N:småkårsm 765 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139496
spamfilter+N:spamfilt 815 ; ! LEMMA_ID=136566
stavefeil+N:stavefeil 749 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124996
stayups+N:stayups 783 ; ! LEMMA_ID=123704
stores+N:stores 740 ; ! LEMMA_ID=131369
storfebonde+N:storfeb 760 ; ! LEMMA_ID=128740
sturten+N:sturten 797 ; ! LEMMA_ID=139836
telemarksski+N:telemarksski 903 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124721
titusenmeter+N:titusenmet 741 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124983
utemøbel+N:utemøb 816 ; ! LEMMA_ID=136996
valium+N:valium 740 ; ! LEMMA_ID=117448
vassflaggermus+N:vassflaggerm 940 ; ! LEMMA_ID=130360
veremodus+N:veremod 756 ; ! LEMMA_ID=128839
VM+N:VM 805 ; ! LEMMA_ID=111920
